Rhode Island, session 2025, SB126.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 28-7 of the General Laws entitled "Labor Relations Act" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
28-7-50. Employee rights of free speech in the workplace.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Political matters" means topics that are unrelated to the employer's business or
business activities, such as subjects relating to elections for political office, political parties,
proposals to change legislation or regulations which are not directly related to the employer's
business, and a decision whether to join or support any political party or political, civic, community,
fraternal or labor organization; and
(2) "Religious matters" means matters relating to religious affiliation and practice and the
decision whether to join or support any religious organization or association.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this section, an employer or the
employer's agent, representative or designee shall not discharge, discipline or otherwise penalize
or threaten to discharge, discipline or otherwise penalize or take any adverse employment action
against an employee because of the employee's refusal to:
(1) Attend an employer-sponsored meeting with the employer or its agent, representative
or designee, the primary purpose of which is to communicate the employer's opinion concerning
religious or political matters; or

(2) Listen to speech or view communications, including electronic communications, from
the employer or its agent, representative or designee, the primary purpose of which is to
communicate the employer's opinion concerning religious or political matters.
(c) Nothing in this section shall prohibit:
(1) An employer or its agent, representative or designee from communicating to its
employees any information that the employer is required by law to communicate, but only to the
extent of such legal requirement;
(2) An employer or its agent, representative or designee from communicating to its
employees any information that is necessary for such employees to perform their job duties;
(3) An institution of higher education, or any agent, representative or designee of such
institution, from meeting with or participating in any communications with its employees that are
part of coursework, any symposia or an academic program at such institution; or
(4) Casual conversations between employees or between an employee and an agent,
representative or designee of an employer; provided that, participation in such conversations is not
required.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a religious corporation, entity,
association, educational institution or society that is exempt from the requirements of Title VII of
the Civil Rights Act of 1964 pursuant to 42 USC 2000e-1(a) with respect to speech on religious
matters to employees who perform work connected with the activities undertaken by such religious
corporation, entity, association, educational institution or society.
(e) In a civil action to enforce this section, the court may award a prevailing employee all
appropriate relief, including injunctive relief, reinstatement to the employee's former position or an
equivalent position, back pay and reestablishment of any employee benefits, including seniority, to
which the employee would otherwise have been eligible if the violation had not occurred, and
damages. The court shall also award a prevailing employee reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000415/SUB A
========
LC000415/SUB A - Page 2 of 3